Nevada, session 83, SB255.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall develop or otherwise prescribe for
administration pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) A school climate survey to gather data from school staff for
the purpose of evaluating the school climate in the public schools
in this State.
(b) An exit and transfer survey to gather data from teachers
who transfer, resign or are dismissed for the purpose of improving
the efforts of this State to attract and retain teachers.
2. The Department may partner with any person or entity
with expertise in education or data collection and survey
administration to assist with developing a survey pursuant to this
section.
3. The board of trustees of a school district shall administer:
(a) The school climate survey developed or prescribed
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to each member of the
staff of each school within the school district once each school
year.
(b) The exit and transfer survey developed or prescribed
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 to each teacher upon
the transfer, resignation or dismissal of the teacher from a school
in the school district.
4. The board of trustees of a school district may partner with
the Department and any other person or entity with expertise in
data collection and survey administration to assist with
administering and collecting the responses of a survey pursuant to
this section.
5. On or before December 1 of each year, the board of
trustees of a school district shall report to the Department a
summary of the information that the board of trustees has received
from administering the surveys pursuant to subsection 3 in the
immediately preceding 12 months. The board of trustees must also
include with the report the raw data collected in connection with
the surveys if the Department requests such data.
6. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department
shall develop and publish on an Internet website maintained by
the Department a written report containing a summary of the
-
*SB255*

– 3 –
information received from each school district pursuant to
subsection 5 within the immediately preceding year.
7. As used in this section, “school climate” means the basis of
which to measure the relationships between pupils and the parents
or legal guardians of pupils and educational personnel, the
cultural and linguistic competence of instructional materials and
educational personnel, the emotional and physical safety of pupils
and educational personnel and the social, emotional and academic
development of pupils and educational personnel.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB255*